Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3423
Fees.

The department shall establish and collect
fees for credentialing under the Genetic Counseling Practice Act as provided
in sections 38-151 to 38-157.

Laws 2012, LB831, § 23.